Nebraska, session 109, LB202.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 38-2037, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2037 (1) In addition to the grounds for disciplinary action found in
sections 38-178 and 38-179, a license to practice medicine and surgery or
osteopathic medicine and surgery or a license to practice as a physician
assistant may be denied, refused renewal, limited, revoked, or suspended or
have other disciplinary measures taken against it in accordance with section
38-196 when the applicant or licensee fails to comply with the provisions of
section 71-603.01, 71-604, 71-605, or 71-606 relating to the signing of birth
and death certificates.
(2)(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure the protection of the
rights under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States for
individuals licensed to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine
and surgery by providing for the public expression of differing medical
opinions and allowing such opinions to be subjected to the scrutiny of public
and professional forums. A license to practice medicine and surgery or
osteopathic medicine and surgery shall not be subject to any disciplinary
measures as a result of an applicant or licensee expressing an opinion in a
public or professional forum.
(b) The expression of an opinion by an applicant or licensee in a public
or professional forum does not include the expression of an opinion offered in
the course of the applicant's or licensee's practice, including providing
services to a patient.
Sec. 2. Original section 38-2037, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
-1-